zh-TW: 法規標準: FIVB 沙灘排球; FIVB 室內排球; NCAA; NFHS; 無 (休閒); 標準尺寸/通用; USAV; 其他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn quy định: FIVB bãi biển; FIVB trong nhà; NCAA; NFHS; Không có (giải trí); Kích thước chuẩn / Đa năng; USAV; Khác
ja: 規制基準: FIVBビーチ; FIVBインドア; NCAA; NFHS; なし (レクリエーション); 公式サイズ / ユニバーサル; USAV; その他
pt-BR: Regulamento padrão: FIVB Praia; FIVB Quadra; NCAA; NFHS; Nenhum (recreativo); Tamanho oficial/universal; USAV; Outro
pl: Norma regulacyjna: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Brak (rekreacyjne); Oficjalny rozmiar / uniwersalne; USAV; Inne
it: Norma regolamentare: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Nessuno (amatoriale); Misura ufficiale/Universale; USAV; Altro
fi: Sääntelystandardi: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Ei mitään (harrastekäyttö); Virallinen koko / Yleinen; USAV; Muu
pt-PT: Norma regulamentar: FIVB Praia; FIVB Pavilhão; NCAA; NFHS; Nenhum (recreativo); Tamanho oficial/universal; USAV; Outra
nl: Reguleringsnorm: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Geen (recreatief); Officiële maat / universeel; USAV; Overig
cs: Regulační norma: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Žádný (rekreační); Oficiální velikost / Univerzální; USAV; Jiné
el: Πρότυπο κανονισμού: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Κανένα (ερασιτεχνικό); Επίσημο μέγεθος / Γενικής χρήσης; USAV; Άλλο
en: Regulation standard: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; None (recreational); Official Size / Universal; USAV; Other
lt-LT: Reguliavimo standartas: FIVB paplūdimio; FIVB salės; NCAA; NFHS; Nėra (rekreacinis); Oficialaus dydžio / universalus; USAV; Kitas
de: Regulierungsstandard: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Keine (Freizeit); Offizielle Größe / Universal; USAV; Sonstiges
nb: Reguleringsstandard: FIVB Beach; FIVB Innendørs; NCAA; NFHS; Ingen (rekreasjon); Offisiell størrelse / universell; USAV; Annet
fr: Norme de conformité: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Aucun (récréatif); Taille officielle / Universelle; USAV; Autre
hr-HR: Standard regulacije: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Ništa (rekreativno); Službena veličina / univerzalno; USAV; Ostalo
ru: Стандарт регламента: FIVB (Пляжный волейбол); FIVB (Волейбол в зале); NCAA; NFHS; Нет (любительский); Официальный размер / Универсальный; USAV; Другое
hu: Szabvány szerinti megfelelőség: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Nincs (szabadidős); Hivatalos méret / Univerzális; USAV; Egyéb
ko: 규제 기준: FIVB 비치; FIVB 실내; NCAA; NFHS; 없음(레크리에이션용); 공식 사이즈/공용; USAV; 기타
bg-BG: Стандарт на регулация: FIVB плажен волейбол; FIVB волейбол в зала; NCAA; NFHS; Няма (за любители); Официален размер / Универсален; USAV; Други
sk-SK: Regulačná norma: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Žiadne (rekreačné); Oficiálna veľkosť / univerzálne; USAV; Iné
th: มาตรฐานข้อบังคับ: FIVB ชายหาด; FIVB ในร่ม; NCAA; NFHS; ไม่มี (สันทนาการ); ขนาดมาตรฐาน / สากล; USAV; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Standard de reglementare: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Niciunul (recreațional); Mărime oficială / universală; USAV; Altele
tr: Resmi standart: FIVB Plaj; FIVB Salon; NCAA; NFHS; Yok (eğlence amaçlı); Resmi Boyut / Evrensel; USAV; Diğer
zh-CN: 比赛标准: FIVB 沙滩排球标准; FIVB 室内排球标准; NCAA 标准; NFHS 标准; 无（休闲娱乐）; 官方尺寸 / 通用; USAV; 其他
da: Reguleringsstandard: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indendørs; NCAA; NFHS; Ingen (rekreativ); Officiel størrelse / universel; USAV; Andet
es: Estándar reglamentario: FIVB Playa; FIVB Interior; NCAA; NFHS; Ninguno (recreativo); Tamaño oficial/universal; USAV; Otro
sv: Reglerstandard: FIVB Beach; FIVB Indoor; NCAA; NFHS; Ingen (rekreation); Officiell storlek/universell; USAV; Annat
sl-SI: Uradni tekmovalni standard: FIVB na mivki; FIVB dvoranska; NCAA; NFHS; Brez (rekreativno); Uradna velikost / univerzalno; USAV; Drugo